North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 14. Department of Social Rehabilitation and Control. [Repealed]

§§ 143A-163 through 143A-170.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1262, s. 10.

Cross References.

As to transfer of the functions of the Department of Social Rehabilitation and Control to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, see G.S. 143B-704.